Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 11 TLSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js H.F. 469 DIVISION I 1 VETERAN PREFERENCE ââ STATE GRANTS 2 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 35.4 Veteran preference ââ state 3 grants. 4 1. A state agency shall give preference to a veteran over 5 other applicants of no greater qualifications for the award of 6 a grant that is overseen, implemented, or funded by the state. 7 2. For purposes of this section, âstate agencyâ means the 8 same as defined in section 8.11. 9 DIVISION II 10 VETERAN PREFERENCE ââ PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 35C.10 Veteran preference ââ public 12 assistance programs. 13 Veterans who are citizens and residents of the United States 14 are entitled to preference for assistance programs including 15 but not limited to public assistance pursuant to chapter 16 239, the family investment program pursuant to chapter 239B, 17 the supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and 18 children, the state child care assistance program established 19 pursuant to section 237A.13, and the United States department 20 of housing and urban development housing choice voucher 21 program. 22 DIVISION III 23 BUSINESS FEE WAIVERS 24 Sec. 3. Section 9.11, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 As used in this subchapter part, unless the context 27 otherwise requires: 28 Sec. 4. Section 9.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 9.12 Rules. 31 The secretary shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 32 necessary or desirable to administer this subchapter part , 33 including by offering and performing extra filing services upon 34 request by filers. The rules may increase the amount of a 35 -1- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 1/ 24 H.F. 469 surcharge implemented, assessed, and collected, or modify the 1 period of service as provided under this subchapter part . 2 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 9.21 Definitions. 3 As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires: 4 1. âSecretaryâ means the secretary of state. 5 2. âWaiverâ means a military service filing fee waiver as 6 provided in sections 9.22 and 9.23. 7 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 9.22 Rules. 8 1. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to 9 chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this part. 10 2. The rules adopted pursuant to subsection 1 shall at least 11 provide procedures governing a request by a qualified business 12 entity to receive a military service filing fee waiver from 13 the secretary, the secretaryâs approval or rejection of that 14 request, and the qualified business entityâs receipt and use of 15 that waiver by an eligible filer, all as provided in sections 16 9.24 and 9.25. 17 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 9.23 Fees not subject to waiver. 18 1. This part does not apply to waive a fee imposed on a 19 filed select document if the qualified business entity receives 20 the waiver after the select document is filed, unless the 21 secretary of state allows for the refund of such fee. 22 2. This part does not prohibit the refund of a filing fee 23 otherwise authorized by another provision of law. 24 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 9.24 Military service filing fee 25 waiver. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 27 the secretary of state shall establish a military service 28 filing fee waiver. The waiver shall apply to select documents, 29 if filed on behalf of a qualified business entity by an 30 eligible filer, and approved by the secretary, as provided in 31 section 9.25. 32 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 9.25 Qualifications for business 33 entities, eligibility for filers, and selection of documents ââ 34 criteria. 35 -2- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 2/ 24 H.F. 469 1. A business entity qualifies to receive a military 1 service filing fee waiver if the business entity is any of the 2 following: 3 a. A domestic limited partnership formed under chapter 488 4 or a foreign limited partnership transacting business in this 5 state under that chapter. 6 b. A domestic limited liability company formed under chapter 7 489 or a foreign limited liability company doing business in 8 this state under that chapter. 9 c. A domestic corporation formed under chapter 490 or a 10 foreign corporation doing business in this state under that 11 chapter. 12 d. A domestic nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 504 13 or a foreign nonprofit corporation transacting business in this 14 state under that chapter. 15 2. An individual is eligible to sign for filing a select 16 document receiving a waiver on behalf of the qualified business 17 entity, if the individual is all of the following: 18 a. An interest holder in the qualified business entity. 19 b. Any of the following: 20 (1) An officer or enlisted member serving in the armed 21 forces of the United States, including any component, part, or 22 corps of the armed forces of the United States, as described 23 in chapter 29A. 24 (2) An officer or enlisted member of the national guard or 25 organized reserves of the armed forces of the United States; 26 any regular, reserve, or auxiliary member of the United States 27 coast guard; or any member of the civil air patrol. 28 (3) A veteran as defined in section 35.1. 29 3. A document is selected to receive a waiver only if the 30 document is named in the following: 31 a. Section 488.117A, subsection 1, for limited partnerships. 32 b. Section 489.122, subsection 1, for limited liability 33 companies. 34 c. Section 490.122, subsection 1, for corporations. 35 -3- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 3/ 24 H.F. 469 d. Section 504.113, subsection 1, for nonprofit 1 corporations. 2 4. The secretary by rule may provide for all of the 3 following: 4 a. Additional requirements for the qualifications of a 5 business entity, the eligibility of a filer, or a documentâs 6 selection for waiver. 7 b. A routine approval process. 8 Sec. 10. Section 488.117A, subsection 1, unnumbered 9 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 The Except as provided in subsection 4, the secretary of 11 state shall collect the following fees when the documents 12 described in this subsection are delivered to the secretaryâs 13 office for filing: 14 Sec. 11. Section 488.117A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 15 the following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. A limited partnership, filing as a 17 qualified business entity under chapter 9, subchapter II, part 18 2, may request and shall receive a military service filing fee 19 waiver for a select document named in subsection 1. 20 Sec. 12. Section 489.122, subsection 1, unnumbered 21 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 The Except as provided in subsection 3A, the secretary of 23 state shall collect the following fees when documents described 24 in this subsection are delivered to the secretaryâs office for 25 filing: 26 Sec. 13. Section 489.122, Code 2025, is amended by adding 27 the following new subsection: 28 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. A limited liability company, or foreign 29 limited liability company, filing as a qualified business 30 entity under chapter 9, subchapter II, part 2, may request and 31 shall receive a military service filing fee waiver for a select 32 document named in subsection 1. 33 Sec. 14. Section 490.122, subsection 1, unnumbered 34 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -4- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 4/ 24 H.F. 469 The Except as provided in subsection 4, the secretary of 1 state shall collect the following fees when the documents 2 described in this subsection are delivered to the secretary of 3 state for filing: 4 Sec. 15. Section 490.122, Code 2025, is amended by adding 5 the following new subsection: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. A corporation, or a foreign corporation, 7 filing as a qualified business entity under chapter 9, 8 subchapter II, part 2, may request and shall receive a military 9 service filing fee waiver for a select document named in 10 subsection 1. 11 Sec. 16. Section 504.113, subsection 1, unnumbered 12 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 The Except as provided in subsection 4, the secretary of 14 state shall collect the following fees, as provided by the 15 secretary of state, when the documents described in this 16 subsection are delivered for filing: 17 Sec. 17. Section 504.113, Code 2025, is amended by adding 18 the following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. A corporation, filing as a qualified 20 business entity under chapter 9, subchapter II, part 2, may 21 request and shall receive a military service filing fee waiver 22 for a select document named in subsection 1. 23 Sec. 18. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 24 designate chapter 9, subchapter II, sections 9.11 through 9.15 25 as part 1 and sections 9.21 through 9.25 as part 2. 26 Sec. 19. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 27 effect January 1, 2026. 28 DIVISION IV 29 SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER PROGRAMS ââ MENTAL HEALTH AND DISABILITY 30 SERVICES 31 Sec. 20. NEW SECTION . 125.35 Veterans ââ priority 32 assistance. 33 Each facility licensed under this chapter that maintains a 34 wait list for care, maintenance, or treatment of persons with 35 -5- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 5/ 24 H.F. 469 a substance use disorder shall place a veteran, as defined in 1 section 35.1, on the wait list in a position that allows the 2 veteran priority for acceptance into the treatment program 3 under section 125.32 before any person on the wait list who is 4 not a veteran, but after each veteran currently on the wait 5 list. 6 Sec. 21. NEW SECTION . 225C.22 Veterans ââ priority 7 assistance. 8 Each service provider operating through the mental health 9 and disability services regional service system that maintains 10 a wait list for mental health or disability services shall 11 place a veteran, as defined in section 35.1, on the wait list 12 in a position that allows the veteran to receive the services 13 before any person on the wait list who is not a veteran, but 14 after each veteran currently on the wait list. 15 DIVISION V 16 WAIVER OF UNDERGRADUATE TUITION AND MANDATORY FEES 17 Sec. 22. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 17A. a. Subject to paragraph âbâ , adopt 20 rules that require institutions of higher education under 21 its control to waive all undergraduate tuition and mandatory 22 fees for veterans or a dependent of a veteran, if designated 23 by a veteran, while the veteran or dependent is enrolled in 24 the institution of higher education, if all of the following 25 requirements are satisfied: 26 (1) The veteran was a resident of this state immediately 27 prior to joining the armed forces of the United States. 28 (2) The veteran was discharged from the armed forces of the 29 United States under honorable conditions. 30 (3) The veteran resides in this state immediately prior 31 to applying to enroll, or prior to the dependent applying to 32 enroll, in the institution of higher education. 33 b. The rules shall not waive an amount of tuition and 34 mandatory fees that exceeds the difference between the combined 35 -6- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 6/ 24 H.F. 469 amount of tuition and mandatory fees charged by the institution 1 less any federal financial aid award the veteran or dependent 2 receives under any federal program that provides financial aid 3 to veterans. 4 c. For purposes of this subsection: 5 (1) âDependentâ means the spouse or child of a veteran. 6 (2) âVeteranâ means the same as defined in section 35.1. 7 DIVISION VI 8 DRIVERâS LICENSE ââ VETERAN STATUS ââ FEES 9 Sec. 23. Section 321.189, subsection 8, Code 2025, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 8. Veterans Veteran status. A licensee who is an honorably 12 discharged a veteran of the armed forces of the United States , 13 as defined in section 35.1, may request that the license be 14 marked to reflect the licenseeâs veteran status. Upon such 15 a request, the word âVETERANâ shall be marked prominently on 16 the face of the license. Such a license shall be issued upon 17 receipt of satisfactory proof of veteran status pursuant to 18 procedures established by the department in consultation with 19 the department of veterans affairs, or upon presentation of 20 the licenseeâs certification of release or discharge from 21 active duty, DD form 214, to the department at the time of 22 the licenseeâs request, if the form indicates the licensee 23 was honorably discharged. If the license is issued upon 24 presentation of the licenseeâs certification of release or 25 discharge from active duty, DD form 214, the department shall 26 notify the commission of veteran affairs of the county of the 27 licenseeâs residence that the licensee was issued a license 28 marked to reflect the licenseeâs veteran status. After 29 receiving notification from the department, the commission of 30 veteran affairs shall initiate contact with the licensee. 31 Sec. 24. Section 321.191, subsection 10, paragraph a, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 a. The fees set forth under subsections 2 , 3, 4, and 5 to an 34 applicant who is a veteran with a permanent service-connected 35 -7- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 7/ 24 H.F. 469 disability rating of one hundred percent, as certified by the 1 United States department of veterans affairs , as defined in 2 section 35.1 . 3 DIVISION VII 4 VEHICLE REGISTRATION FEES ââ VETERANS EXEMPT 5 Sec. 25. Section 321.105, Code 2025, is amended by adding 6 the following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. A veteran, as defined in section 35.1, 8 who is not otherwise exempt under subsection 5, is exempt from 9 payment of annual registration fees provided in this chapter 10 for not more than three vehicles registered by the veteran, if 11 the veteran resides in Iowa. The veteran shall be provided, 12 without fee, one set of regular registration plates for each 13 vehicle. In lieu of the set of regular registration plates 14 available without fee, the veteran may obtain a set of special 15 registration plates or personalized registration plates issued 16 under section 321.34 by paying the additional fees associated 17 with those plates. 18 DIVISION VIII 19 DISABLED VETERAN TAX CREDIT 20 Sec. 26. NEW SECTION . 426D.1 Disabled veterans property 21 tax credit. 22 1. For purposes of this section, âqualifying veteranâ means 23 a person who meets the definition of a veteran under section 24 35.1, and has a disability rating of twenty percent or more as 25 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs. 26 2. A qualifying veteran shall be allowed a credit on each 27 property that is owned solely by the qualifying veteran or 28 jointly by the qualifying veteran and the qualifying veteranâs 29 spouse. 30 3. The amount of the credit under this section on a property 31 shall be equal to the property tax owed on the property 32 multiplied by the disability rating given to the qualifying 33 veteran as certified by the United States department of 34 veterans affairs, up to a maximum reduction of ten thousand 35 -8- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 8/ 24 H.F. 469 dollars per property. 1 4. The credit allowed under this section shall continue 2 until the later to occur of the following: 3 a. The qualifying veteran dies. 4 b. The qualifying veteranâs surviving spouse dies or the 5 qualifying veteranâs surviving spouse remarries, whichever is 6 earlier. 7 5. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , the list of 8 the names and addresses of individuals allowed a credit under 9 this section and maintained by the county recorder, county 10 treasurer, county assessor, city assessor, or other government 11 body is confidential information and shall not be disseminated 12 to any person unless otherwise ordered by a court or released 13 by the lawful custodian of the records pursuant to state or 14 federal law. The county recorder, county treasurer, county 15 assessor, city assessor, or other government body responsible 16 for maintaining the names and addresses of individuals 17 allowed a credit under this section may display the credit on 18 individual paper records and individual electronic records, 19 including display on an internet site. 20 b. Upon request, a county recorder, county assessor, city 21 assessor, or other entity may share information as described 22 in paragraph âaâ with a county veterans service officer for 23 purposes of providing information on benefits and services 24 available to veterans and their families. 25 Sec. 27. NEW SECTION . 426D.2 Computation by auditor. 26 On or before August 1 of each year, the county auditor 27 shall certify to the county treasurer all claims for disabled 28 veteran tax credits which have been allowed by the board of 29 supervisors. Such certificate shall list the total amount 30 of dollars, listed by taxing district in the county, due for 31 disabled veteran tax credits claimed and allowed. The county 32 treasurer shall certify to the department of revenue the amount 33 of dollars, listed by taxing district in the county, due for 34 disabled veteran tax credits claimed and allowed. 35 -9- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 9/ 24 H.F. 469 Sec. 28. NEW SECTION . 426D.3 Certification by director of 1 revenue. 2 Sums distributable from the general fund of the state 3 shall be allocated annually to the counties of the state. 4 On September 15 of each year, the director of revenue shall 5 certify and the department of administrative services shall 6 draw warrants to the treasurer of each county payable from the 7 general fund of the state in the amount claimed. Payments 8 shall be made to the treasurer of each county no later than 9 September 30 of each year. 10 Sec. 29. NEW SECTION . 426D.4 Proportionate shares to 11 districts. 12 The amount of credits received under this chapter shall be 13 apportioned by each county treasurer to the several taxing 14 districts. Each taxing district shall receive its share of the 15 disabled veteran tax credit allowed in the taxing district on a 16 property in an amount equal to the proportion of the levy made 17 by the taxing district in relation to the total of all levies 18 made on the property. 19 Sec. 30. NEW SECTION . 426D.5 Setting aside allowance. 20 If the department of revenue determines that a claim for 21 disabled veteran tax credit has been allowed by a board of 22 supervisors which is not justifiable under the law and not 23 substantiated by proper facts, the department may, at any time 24 within thirty-six months from July 1 of the year in which 25 the claim is allowed, set aside the allowance. Notice of 26 the disallowance shall be given to the county auditor of the 27 county in which the claim has been improperly granted and a 28 written notice of the disallowance shall also be addressed 29 to the claimant at the claimantâs last known address. The 30 claimant or the board of supervisors may appeal to the 31 director of revenue within thirty days from the date of the 32 notice of disallowance. The director shall grant a hearing 33 and if, upon the hearing, the director determines that the 34 disallowance was incorrect, the director shall set aside the 35 -10- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 10/ 24 H.F. 469 disallowance. The director shall notify the claimant and 1 the board of supervisors of the result of the hearing. The 2 claimant or the board of supervisors may seek judicial review 3 of the action of the director of revenue in accordance with 4 chapter 17A. If a claim is disallowed by the department of 5 revenue and not appealed to the director of revenue or appealed 6 to the director of revenue and subsequently upheld upon final 7 resolution, including judicial review, the credits allowed and 8 paid from the general fund of the state become a lien upon the 9 property on which the credit was originally granted if the 10 property is still owned by the claimant and not a bona fide 11 purchaser. The amount owing on the lien shall be collected by 12 the county treasurer in the same manner as other taxes, and 13 the collections shall be returned to the department of revenue 14 and credited to the general fund of the state. The director 15 of revenue may institute legal proceedings against a disabled 16 veteran tax credit claimant for the collection of payments made 17 on disallowed credits. 18 Sec. 31. NEW SECTION . 426D.6 Forms ââ rules. 19 1. The director of revenue shall prescribe the form for 20 making a verified statement and designating property for the 21 disabled veteran tax credit and such other forms as may be 22 necessary for the proper administration of this chapter. The 23 department of revenue shall forward to each county auditor 24 prescribed sample forms. 25 2. The department of revenue shall adopt rules pursuant to 26 chapter 17A to implement and administer this chapter. 27 Sec. 32. NEW SECTION . 426D.7 Excess remitted ââ appeals. 28 1. If the amount of credit apportioned to any property 29 eligible for a disabled veteran tax credit under this chapter 30 in any year shall exceed the total tax, exclusive of any 31 special assessments levied against such property eligible 32 for the disabled veteran tax credit, then the excess shall 33 be remitted by the county treasurer to the department of 34 revenue to be redeposited in the general fund of the state and 35 -11- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 11/ 24 H.F. 469 reallocated the following year by the department. 1 2. a. If any claim for a credit made has been denied 2 by the board of supervisors, and the action is subsequently 3 reversed on appeal, the credit shall be allowed on the assessed 4 valuation, not to exceed the amount of the disabled veteran 5 tax credit involved in the appeal, as was allowed on other 6 disabled veteran tax credit valuations for the year or years in 7 question, and the director of revenue, the county auditor, and 8 the county treasurer shall credit and change their books and 9 records accordingly. 10 b. If the appealing taxpayer has paid one or both of 11 the installments of the tax payable in the year or years 12 in question on the disabled veteran tax credit valuation, 13 remittance shall be made to the county treasurer in the amount 14 of such credit. 15 c. The amount of the credit shall be allocated and paid 16 from the surplus redeposited in the general fund of the state 17 provided for in subsection 1. 18 Sec. 33. NEW SECTION . 426D.8 Erroneous credits. 19 If any claim is allowed, and subsequently reversed on 20 appeal, any credit shall be void, and the amount of the 21 credit shall be charged against the property in question, and 22 the director of revenue, the county auditor, and the county 23 treasurer shall correct their books and records. The amount of 24 the erroneous credit, when collected, shall be returned by the 25 county treasurer to the general fund of the state. 26 Sec. 34. NEW SECTION . 426D.9 Allowance ââ continuing 27 effectiveness. 28 1. The assessor shall retain a permanent file of current 29 disabled veteran tax credit claims filed in the assessorâs 30 office. The assessor shall file a notice of transfer of 31 property for which a claim is filed when notice is received 32 from the office of the county recorder, from the person 33 who sold or transferred the property, or from the personal 34 representative of a deceased claimant. 35 -12- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 12/ 24 H.F. 469 2. The county recorder shall give notice to the assessor 1 of each transfer of title filed in the recorderâs office. The 2 notice shall describe the property transferred, the name of the 3 person transferring the title to the property, and the name of 4 the person to whom title to the property has been transferred. 5 3. Not later than July 6 of each year, the assessor shall 6 remit the claims and designations of property to the county 7 auditor with the assessorâs recommendation for allowance 8 or disallowance. If the assessor recommends disallowance 9 of a claim, the assessor shall submit the reasons for the 10 recommendation, in writing, to the county auditor. 11 4. The county auditor shall forward the claims to the board 12 of supervisors. The board shall allow or disallow the claims. 13 If the board disallows a claim, it shall send written notice, 14 by mail, to the claimant at the claimantâs last known address. 15 The notice shall state the reasons for disallowing the claim 16 for the credit. The board is not required to send notice that 17 a claim is disallowed if the claimant voluntarily withdraws the 18 claim. 19 5. Any person whose claim is denied under the provisions 20 of this chapter may appeal from the action of the board of 21 supervisors in the district court of the county in which said 22 claimed disabled veteran tax credit is situated by giving 23 written notice of such appeal to the county auditor of said 24 county within twenty days from the date of mailing of notice of 25 such action by the board of supervisors. 26 6. Upon adoption of a resolution by the county board of 27 supervisors, any person may request, in writing, from the 28 appropriate assessor forms for the filing for a disabled 29 veteran tax credit. The person may complete the form, which 30 shall include a statement claiming the disabled veteran tax 31 credit and designating the property upon which the tax credit 32 is claimed, and mail or return it to the appropriate assessor. 33 The signature of the claimant on the claim shall be considered 34 the claimantâs acknowledgment that all statements and facts 35 -13- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 13/ 24 H.F. 469 entered on the form are correct to the best of the claimantâs 1 knowledge. 2 Sec. 35. NEW SECTION . 426D.10 Penalty. 3 Any person making a false affidavit for the purpose of 4 obtaining the credit provided for in this chapter or who 5 knowingly receives the credit without being legally entitled to 6 the credit, shall be guilty of a fraudulent practice. 7 Sec. 36. NEW SECTION . 426D.11 Appropriations. 8 There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 9 the amounts necessary to fund the credits provided under this 10 chapter. 11 DIVISION IX 12 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES ââ LICENSES AND FEES 13 Sec. 37. Section 455A.14, Code 2025, is amended by adding 14 the following new subsection: 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The department shall not require a 16 veteran to pay a fee established by the department pursuant to 17 this section. The department of veterans affairs shall assist 18 the department in verifying the status or claims of applicants 19 under this subsection. As used in this subsection, âveteranâ 20 means the same as defined in section 35.1. 21 Sec. 38. NEW SECTION . 462A.5B Veteran registration fee. 22 A veteran who submits a proper application for a vessel 23 registration pursuant to section 462A.5 shall receive a 24 registration certificate from the county recorder without 25 paying a registration or writing fee. The department of 26 veterans affairs shall assist the department and the county 27 recorderâs office in verifying the status or claims of 28 applicants under this section. As used in this section, 29 âveteranâ means the same as defined in section 35.1. 30 Sec. 39. Section 483A.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 1. a. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter , a 33 person shall not fish, trap, hunt, pursue, catch, kill, take 34 in any manner, use, have possession of, sell, or transport 35 -14- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 14/ 24 H.F. 469 all or a part of any wild animal, bird, game, turtle, or 1 fish, the protection and regulation of which is desirable for 2 the conservation of resources of the state, without first 3 obtaining a license for that purpose, and the payment of a fee 4 as established by rules adopted by the commission pursuant to 5 chapter 17A . 6 b. A veteran applying for any hunting, fur harvester, or 7 fishing license issued pursuant to paragraph âaâ , whether 8 general or specific, is not required to pay a fee to obtain 9 the license. The department of veterans affairs shall assist 10 the department in verifying the status or claims of applicants 11 under this paragraph. As used in this paragraph, âveteranâ 12 means the same as defined in section 35.1. 13 Sec. 40. Section 483A.3, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 14 by adding the following new paragraph: 15 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. A veteran who has obtained a valid 16 hunting or fur harvester license pursuant to section 483A.1 is 17 not required to pay the wildlife habitat fee for that license. 18 The department of veterans affairs shall assist the department 19 in verifying the status or claims of applicants under this 20 paragraph. As used in this paragraph, âveteranâ means the same 21 as defined in section 35.1. 22 Sec. 41. Section 483A.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 483A.6 Trout fishing fee. 25 Any person required to have a fishing license , except for 26 a veteran, shall not fish for or possess trout unless that 27 person has paid the trout fishing fee. The department shall 28 not require a veteran to pay a trout fishing fee. The proceeds 29 from the fee shall be used exclusively for the trout program 30 designated by the commission. The commission may grant a 31 permit to a community event in which trout will be stocked in 32 water which that is not designated trout water and a person may 33 catch and possess trout during the period and from the water 34 covered by the permit without having paid the trout fishing 35 -15- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 15/ 24 H.F. 469 fee. For purposes of this section, âveteranâ means the same as 1 defined in section 35.1. 2 Sec. 42. Section 483A.24, subsections 16 and 19, Code 2025, 3 are amended to read as follows: 4 16. Upon payment of the fee established by rules adopted 5 pursuant to section 483A.1 application for a lifetime fishing 6 license or lifetime hunting and fishing combined license, the 7 department shall issue a lifetime fishing license or lifetime 8 hunting and fishing combined license to a resident of Iowa 9 who has served in the armed forces of the United States on 10 federal active duty and who was disabled or was a prisoner of 11 war during that veteranâs military service. The department 12 shall prepare an application to be used by a person requesting 13 a lifetime fishing license or lifetime hunting and fishing 14 combined license under this subsection . The department of 15 veterans affairs shall assist the department in verifying the 16 status or claims of applicants under this subsection . As used 17 in this subsection , âdisabledâ means entitled to a service 18 connected rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. 19 19. Upon payment of a fee established by rules adopted 20 pursuant to section 483A.1 application for a lifetime trout 21 fishing license, the department shall issue a lifetime trout 22 fishing license to a person who is at least sixty-five years 23 of age or to a person who qualifies for the disabled veteran 24 homestead credit under section 425.15 . The department shall 25 prepare an application to be used by a person requesting a 26 lifetime trout fishing license under this subsection . 27 DIVISION X 28 CIVIL LITIGATION BY VETERANS 29 Sec. 43. NEW SECTION . 610B.1 Civil actions or appeals 30 brought by veterans. 31 If a person bringing a civil action or appeal is a veteran, 32 as defined in section 35.1, the court shall make every effort 33 to grant the veteran priority over other actions brought by 34 other persons, including granting the highest scheduling 35 -16- LSB 1958YH (4) 91 sc/js 16/ 24 H.F. 469 priority to a veteranâs proceedings. 1 DIVISION XI 2 PERMIT TO CARRY WEAPONS FEES 3 Sec. 44. Section 724.11, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 3. a. The issuing officer shall collect a fee of fifty 6 dollars for an initial permit, except from a duly appointed 7 peace officer or correctional officer, for each permit issued. 8 Renewal permits or duplicate permits shall be issued for a 9 fee of twenty-five dollars, provided the application for such 10 renewal permit is received by the issuing officer within thirty 11 days prior to the expiration of the applicantâs current permit 12 or within thirty days after the expiration of the applicantâs 13 current permit. The issuing officer shall notify the 14 commissioner of public safety of the issuance of any permit at 15 least monthly and forward to the commissioner an amount equal 16 to ten dollars for each permit issued and five dollars for each 17 renewal or duplicate permit issued. All such fees received 18 by the commissioner shall be paid to the treasurer of state 19 and deposited in the operating account of the department of 20 public safety to offset the cost of administering this chapter . 21 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any unspent balance as of June 30 22 of each year shall not revert to the general fund of the state. 23 b. A veteran, as defined in section 35.1, who has a 24 service-connected disability is exempt from payment of fees 25 imposed under this subsection. The department of veterans 26 affairs shall assist in verifying the status or claims of an 27 applicant under this paragraph. As used in this paragraph, 28 âservice-connected disabilityâ means a condition entitling the 29 veteran to a service-connected rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. 30